Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 9 State Auditorium

37-9-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2425, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 2908, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-9-1

; P.L. 1974, ch. 110, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 34, § 1, effective June 30, 1990.

37-9-2.
Policies for use of auditorium.

The director of administration is hereby authorized and empowered to determine and administer the policies of use which shall apply to the state auditorium in the Veterans’ Memorial Building, at Providence, Rhode Island; to determine the patterns and standards of performance, entertainment, instruction, and other modes and purposes of use of the facilities of the state auditorium; and to determine prices, charges, schedules, contract terms, and conditions as well as any and all other matters brought about by the public and private use, presentation, and rental thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2425, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

37-9-3

; G.L. 1956, §

37-9-2

; P.L. 1974, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 34, § 2.

37-9-3.
Agreements for use.

The director of administration is hereby vested with the authority to enter into contracts and agreements for the use of the state auditorium.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2425, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

37-9-4

; G.L. 1956, §

37-9-3

; P.L. 1974, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 34, § 2.

37-9-4.
Selection of staff.

The director of administration shall select any clerical and other staff necessary to the administration of duties of the state auditorium.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2425, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

37-9-5

; G.L. 1956, §

37-9-4

; P.L. 1974, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 34, § 2.

37-9-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2425, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

37-9-6

; G.L. 1956, §

37-9-5

; P.L. 1974, ch. 110, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 34, § 1, effective June 30, 1990.

37-9-6.
Disposition of income.

All income and receipts derived from whatever source and arising out of the use of the auditorium shall be deposited as general revenues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2425, § 7; G.L. 1956, §§

37-9-6

,

37-9-7

; P.L. 1974, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 34, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 112.

37-9-7.
Maintenance.

The physical maintenance and management of the auditorium shall remain and be vested in the department of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2425, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §§

37-9-7

, 37-9-8; P.L. 1974, ch. 110, § 1.